Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.440

Statewide information technology system development revolving account—Contracts for enterprise information technology systems—"Enterprise information technology system" defined.

(1) The statewide information technology system development revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from legislative appropriations and assessments to agencies for the development and acquisition of enterprise information technology systems must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. The account must be used solely for the development and acquisition of enterprise information technology systems that are consistent with the enterprise-based strategy established by Washington technology solutions in RCW 43.105.025. Expenditures from the account may not be used for maintenance and operations of enterprise information technology systems. The account may be used for the payment of salaries, wages, and other costs directly related to the development and acquisition of enterprise information technology systems.

(2) All payment of principal and interest on debt issued for enterprise information technology systems must be paid from the account.

(3) The office may contract for the development or acquisition of enterprise information technology systems.

(4) For the purposes of this section and RCW 43.41.442, "enterprise information technology system" means an information technology system that serves agencies with a certain business need or process that are required to use the system unless the agency has received a waiver from the state chief information officer. "Enterprise information technology system" also includes projects that are of statewide significance including enterprise-level solutions, enterprise resource planning, and shared services initiatives.

[ 2024 c 54 s 42; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 502.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.